Washington statutes.
RCW 41.26.550

Reentry.

(1) A member, who had left service and withdrawn the member's funds pursuant to RCW 41.26.540, shall receive service credit for such prior service if the member restores all withdrawn funds together with interest since the time of withdrawal as determined by the department.

The restoration of such funds must be completed within five years of the resumption of service or prior to retirement, whichever occurs first.

(2) If a member fails to meet the time limitations of subsection (1) of this section, the member may receive service credit destroyed by the withdrawn contributions if the amount required under RCW 41.50.165(2) is paid.

[ 1994 c 197 s 11; 1993 c 517 s 7; 1977 ex.s. c 294 s 16.]

NOTES:

Intent—Severability—Effective date—1994 c 197: See notes following RCW 41.50.165.

Purpose—1993 c 517: See note following RCW 41.26.420.

Legislative direction and placement—Section headings—1977 ex.s. c 294: See notes following RCW 41.26.410.